Florida, session 2026, HB475.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
117
118 Section 1. Subsections (38) through (50) and (51) through
119 (91) of section 39.01, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as
120 subsections (39) through (51) and (53) through (94),
121 respectively, subsections (10) and (39) are amended, and new
122 subsections (38), (51), and (52) are added to that section, to
123 read:
124 39.01 Definitions.—When used in this chapter, unless the
125 context otherwise requires:
Page 5 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
126 (10) "Caregiver" means the parent, legal custodian,
127 permanent guardian, adult household member, or other person
128 responsible for a child's welfare as defined in subsection (60)
129 (57).
130 (39) "Institutional child abuse or neglect" means
131 situations of known or suspected child abuse or neglect in which
132 the person allegedly perpetrating the child abuse or neglect is
133 an employee of a public or private school, public or private day
134 care center, residential home, institution, facility, or agency
135 or any other person at such institution responsible for the
136 child's welfare as defined in subsection (60) (57).
137 (38) "High-acuity child" means a child age birth to 18 who
138 presents with intensive and complex medical, developmental,
139 behavioral health, or disability needs across multiple areas of
140 functioning and who requires immediate clinical assessment and
141 specialized care, services, and medical placement. The term
142 includes a child who is reasonably presumed to meet the criteria
143 for high-acuity.
144 (51) "Medical bed" means a licensed placement that meets
145 the criteria of a medical placement and is approved by the
146 applicable licensing authority, such as the Department of
147 Health, the Agency for Persons with Disabilities, the Agency for
148 Health Care Administration, or the department.
149 (52) "Medical placement" means a residential setting that
150 provides clinical oversight, licensed nursing care, and
Page 6 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
151 therapeutic supports 24 hours a day, 7 days a week to address
152 the immediate and adequate needs of a high-acuity child being
153 placed who requires intensive, specialized medical care
154 consistent with the standards of the Affordable Care Act and the
155 Centers for Medicare and Medicaid guidelines for pediatric
156 medical necessity.
157 Section 2. Subsection (15) of section 39.01375, Florida
158 Statutes, is renumbered as subsection (16), and a new subsection
159 (15) is added to that section, to read:
160 39.01375 Best interest determination for placement.—The
161 department, community-based care lead agency, or court shall
162 consider all of the following factors when determining whether a
163 proposed placement under this chapter is in the child's best
164 interest:
165 (15) The intensive and complex medical, developmental,
166 behavioral health, or disability needs of a high-acuity child
167 and the need for medical placement under s. 39.4078 to address
168 the high-acuity child's needs.
169 Section 3. Subsection (1) of section 39.302, Florida
170 Statutes, is amended to read:
171 39.302 Protective investigations of institutional child
172 abuse, abandonment, or neglect.—
173 (1) The department shall conduct a child protective
174 investigation of each report of institutional child abuse,
175 abandonment, or neglect. Upon receipt of a report that alleges
Page 7 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
176 that an employee or agent of the department, or any other entity
177 or person covered by s. 39.01(40) or (60) s. 39.01(39) or (57),
178 acting in an official capacity, has committed an act of child
179 abuse, abandonment, or neglect, the department shall initiate a
180 child protective investigation within the timeframe established
181 under s. 39.101(2) and notify the appropriate state attorney,
182 law enforcement agency, and licensing agency, which shall
183 immediately conduct a joint investigation, unless independent
184 investigations are more feasible. When conducting investigations
185 or having face-to-face interviews with the child, investigation
186 visits shall be unannounced unless it is determined by the
187 department or its agent that unannounced visits threaten the
188 safety of the child. If a facility is exempt from licensing, the
189 department shall inform the owner or operator of the facility of
190 the report. Each agency conducting a joint investigation is
191 entitled to full access to the information gathered by the
192 department in the course of the investigation. A protective
193 investigation must include an interview with the child's parent
194 or legal guardian. The department shall make a full written
195 report to the state attorney within 3 business days after making
196 the oral report. A criminal investigation shall be coordinated,
197 whenever possible, with the child protective investigation of
198 the department. Any interested person who has information
199 regarding the offenses described in this subsection may forward
200 a statement to the state attorney as to whether prosecution is
Page 8 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
201 warranted and appropriate. Within 15 days after the completion
202 of the investigation, the state attorney shall report the
203 findings to the department and shall include in the report a
204 determination of whether or not prosecution is justified and
205 appropriate in view of the circumstances of the specific case.
206 Section 4. Subsections (3) and (7) and paragraph (a) of
207 subsection (9) of section 39.303, Florida Statutes, are amended,
208 and paragraph (j) is added to subsection (4) of that section, to
209 read:
210 39.303 Child Protection Teams and sexual abuse treatment
211 programs; services; eligible cases.—
212 (3) The Department of Health shall use and convene the
213 Child Protection Teams to supplement the assessment and
214 protective supervision activities of the family safety and
215 preservation program of the Department of Children and Families.
216 This section does not remove or reduce the duty and
217 responsibility of any person to report pursuant to this chapter
218 all suspected or actual cases of child abuse, abandonment, or
219 neglect or sexual abuse of a child. The role of the Child
220 Protection Teams is to support activities of the program and to
221 provide services, including services necessary and appropriate
222 to address the needs of a high-acuity child, deemed by the Child
223 Protection Teams to be necessary and appropriate to abused,
224 abandoned, and neglected children upon referral. The specialized
225 diagnostic assessment, evaluation, coordination, consultation,
Page 9 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
226 and other supportive services that a Child Protection Team must
227 be capable of providing include, but are not limited to, the
228 following:
229 (a) Medical diagnosis and evaluation services, including
230 provision or interpretation of X rays and laboratory tests, and
231 related services, as needed, and documentation of related
232 findings.
233 (b) Telephone consultation services in emergencies and in
234 other situations.
235 (c) Medical evaluation related to abuse, abandonment, or
236 neglect, as defined by policy or rule of the Department of
237 Health.
238 (d) Such psychological and psychiatric diagnosis and
239 evaluation services for the child or the child's parent or
240 parents, legal custodian or custodians, or other caregivers, or
241 any other individual involved in a child abuse, abandonment, or
242 neglect case, as the team may determine to be needed.
243 (e) Expert medical, psychological, and related
244 professional testimony in court cases.
245 (f) Case staffings to develop treatment plans for children
246 whose cases have been referred to the team. A Child Protection
247 Team may provide consultation with respect to a child who is
248 alleged or is shown to be abused, abandoned, or neglected, which
249 consultation shall be provided at the request of a
250 representative of the family safety and preservation program or
Page 10 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
251 at the request of any other professional involved with a child
252 or the child's parent or parents, legal custodian or custodians,
253 or other caregivers. In every such Child Protection Team case
254 staffing, consultation, or staff activity involving a child, a
255 family safety and preservation program representative shall
256 attend and participate.
257 (g) Case service coordination and assistance, including
258 the location of services available from other public and private
259 agencies in the community.
260 (h) Such training services for program and other employees
261 of the Department of Children and Families, employees of the
262 Department of Health, and other medical professionals as is
263 deemed appropriate to enable them to develop and maintain their
264 professional skills and abilities in handling child abuse,
265 abandonment, and neglect cases. The training service must
266 include training in the recognition of and appropriate responses
267 to head trauma and brain injury in a child under 6 years of age
268 as required by ss. 402.402(2) and 409.988.
269 (i) Educational and community awareness campaigns on child
270 abuse, abandonment, and neglect in an effort to enable citizens
271 more successfully to prevent, identify, and treat child abuse,
272 abandonment, and neglect in the community.
273 (j) Child Protection Team assessments that include, as
274 appropriate, medical evaluations, medical consultations, family
275 psychosocial interviews, specialized clinical interviews, or
Page 11 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
276 forensic interviews.
277 (k) Identifying a child who meets the criteria for a high-
278 acuity child and the basis for the determination of the Child
279 Protection Team.
280
281 A Child Protection Team that is evaluating a report of medical
282 neglect and assessing the health care needs of a medically
283 complex child shall consult with a physician who has experience
284 in treating children with the same condition.
285 (4) The child abuse, abandonment, and neglect reports that
286 must be referred by the department to Child Protection Teams of
287 the Department of Health for an assessment and other appropriate
288 available support services as set forth in subsection (3) must
289 include cases involving:
290 (j) A report involving a high-acuity child or a child
291 believed to meet the criteria of a high-acuity child.
292 (7)(a) In all instances in which a Child Protection Team
293 is providing certain services to abused, abandoned, or neglected
294 children, other offices and units of the Department of Health,
295 and offices and units of the Department of Children and
296 Families, the Agency for Persons with Disabilities, and the
297 Agency for Health Care Administration must shall avoid
298 duplicating the provision of those services.
299 (b) A Child Protection Team may:
300 1. Prioritize the placement of a high-acuity child into a
Page 12 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
301 specialized and appropriate placement in accordance with s.
302 39.4078, including, but not limited to, a medical bed or group
303 home in a facility licensed or maintained by the department,
304 Agency for Persons with Disabilities, Department of Health, or
305 Agency for Health Care Administration, even if such placement is
306 outside of the normal services of the Child Protection Team.
307 2. Require the provision of services to the high-acuity
308 child by an entity deemed appropriate and necessary by the Child
309 Protection Team for the stabilization, treatment, or safety of
310 the high-acuity child, even if such services are outside of the
311 normal services of the Child Protection Team.
312 (9)(a) Children's Medical Services shall convene a task
313 force to develop a standardized protocol for forensic
314 interviewing of children suspected of having been abused. The
315 Department of Health shall provide staff to the task force as
316 necessary. The task force shall include:
317 1. A representative from the Florida Prosecuting Attorneys
318 Association.
319 2. A representative from the Florida Psychological
320 Association.
321 3. The Statewide Medical Director for Child Protection.
322 4. A representative from the Florida Public Defender
323 Association.
324 5. The executive director of the Statewide Guardian ad
325 Litem Office.
Page 13 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
326 6. A representative from a community-based care lead
327 agency.
328 7. A representative from Children's Medical Services.
329 8. A representative from the Florida Sheriffs Association.
330 9. A representative from the Florida Chapter of the
331 American Academy of Pediatrics.
332 10. A representative from the Florida Network of
333 Children's Advocacy Centers.
334 11. Other representatives designated by Children's Medical
335 Services.
336 12. An expert or a direct care provider who has experience
337 in serving high-acuity children.
338 Section 5. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
339 39.4021, Florida Statutes, is amended, and subsection (3) is
340 added to that section, to read:
341 39.4021 Priority placement for out-of-home placements.—
342 (2) PLACEMENT PRIORITY.—
343 (a) Except as provided in subsection (3), when a child
344 cannot safely remain at home with a parent, out-of-home
345 placement options must be considered in the following order:
346 1. Nonoffending parent.
347 2. Relative caregiver.
348 3. Adoptive parent of the child's sibling, when the
349 department or community-based care lead agency is aware of such
350 sibling.
Page 14 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
351 4. Fictive kin with a close existing relationship to the
352 child.
353 5. Nonrelative caregiver that does not have an existing
354 relationship with the child.
355 6. Licensed foster care.
356 7. Group or congregate care.
357 (3) MEDICAL PLACEMENT FOR A HIGH-ACUITY CHILD.—In cases in
358 which a child is identified or assessed as a high-acuity child,
359 the department or any contractor or subcontractor of the
360 department must follow the procedures and requirements in s.
361 39.4078 and place the high-acuity child in a medical placement
362 if he or she meets the eligibility criteria in order to ensure
363 the high-acuity child's complex medical, behavioral, and
364 developmental needs are addressed in an appropriate medical
365 setting.
366 Section 6. Paragraph (c) of subsection (2), paragraph (b)
367 of subsection (3), paragraph (a) of subsection (4), paragraph
368 (a) of subsection (5), and paragraph (d) of subsection (6) of
369 section 39.4022, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
370 39.4022 Multidisciplinary teams; staffings; assessments;
371 report.—
372 (2) DEFINITIONS.—For purposes of this section, the term:
373 (c) "Multidisciplinary team" means an integrated group of
374 individuals which meets to collaboratively develop and attempt
375 to reach a consensus decision on the most suitable out-of-home
Page 15 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
376 placement or the appropriateness of a medical placement under s.
377 39.4078, educational placement, or other specified important
378 life decision that is in the best interest of the child.
379 (3) CREATION AND GOALS.—
380 (b) The multidisciplinary teams must adhere to all of the
381 following goals:
382 1. Secure a child's safety in the least restrictive and
383 intrusive placement that can meet his or her needs.;
384 2. Minimize the trauma associated with separation from the
385 child's family and help the child to maintain meaningful
386 connections with family members and others who are important to
387 him or her.;
388 3. Provide input into the proposed placement decision made
389 by the community-based care lead agency and the proposed
390 services to be provided in order to support the child.;
391 4. Provide input into the decision to preserve or maintain
392 the placement, including necessary placement preservation
393 strategies.;
394 5. Contribute to an ongoing assessment of the child and
395 the family's strengths and needs.;
396 6. Ensure that plans are monitored for progress and that
397 such plans are revised or updated as the child's or family's
398 circumstances change.; and
399 7. Ensure that the child and family always remain the
400 primary focus of each multidisciplinary team meeting.
Page 16 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
401 8. Ensure that if the child meets the classification of a
402 high-acuity child that the multidisciplinary team considers such
403 classification when determining the appropriate placement for
404 the child. The multidisciplinary team must prioritize the
405 placement of a high-acuity child in appropriate specialized
406 placements within the department, the Agency for Persons with
407 Disabilities, the Department of Health, or the Agency for Health
408 Care Administration.
409 (4) PARTICIPANTS.—
410 (a) Collaboration among diverse individuals who are part
411 of the child's network is necessary to make the most informed
412 decisions possible for the child. A diverse team is preferable
413 to ensure that the necessary combination of technical skills,
414 cultural knowledge, community resources, and personal
415 relationships is developed and maintained for the child and
416 family. The participants necessary to achieve an appropriately
417 diverse team for a child may vary by child and may include
418 extended family, friends, neighbors, coaches, clergy, coworkers,
419 or others the family identifies as potential sources of support.
420 1. Each multidisciplinary team staffing must invite all of
421 the following members:
422 a. The child, unless he or she is not of an age or
423 capacity to participate in the team, and the child's guardian ad
424 litem.;
425 b. The child's family members and other individuals
Page 17 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
426 identified by the family as being important to the child,
427 provided that a parent who has a no contact order or injunction,
428 is alleged to have sexually abused the child, or is subject to a
429 termination of parental rights may not participate.;
430 c. The current caregiver, provided the caregiver is not a
431 parent who meets the criteria of one of the exceptions under
432 sub-subparagraph b.;
433 d. A representative from the department other than the
434 Children's Legal Services attorney, when the department is
435 directly involved in the goal identified by the staffing.;
436 e. A representative from the community-based care lead
437 agency, when the lead agency is directly involved in the goal
438 identified by the staffing.;
439 f. The case manager for the child, or his or her case
440 manager supervisor.; and
441 g. A representative from the Department of Juvenile
442 Justice, if the child is dually involved with both the
443 department and the Department of Juvenile Justice. The
444 representative must have the authority to make a same-day
445 placement of a high-acuity child in an appropriate medical
446 placement in the Department of Juvenile Justice if necessary.
447 h. A representative from the Agency for Persons with
448 Disabilities who has the authority to make a same-day placement
449 of a high-acuity child in an appropriate medical placement in
450 the agency if such child meets the eligibility criteria under s.
Page 18 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
451 393.065 and is in a preenrollment category.
452 2. The multidisciplinary team must make reasonable efforts
453 to have all mandatory invitees attend. However, the
454 multidisciplinary team staffing may not be delayed if the
455 invitees in subparagraph 1. fail to attend after being provided
456 reasonable opportunities.
457 (5) SCOPE OF MULTIDISCIPLINARY TEAM.—
458 (a) A multidisciplinary team staffing must be held when an
459 important decision is required to be made about a child's life,
460 including all of the following:
461 1. Initial placement decisions for a child who is placed
462 in out-of-home care. A multidisciplinary team staffing required
463 under this subparagraph may occur before the initial placement
464 or, if a staffing is not possible before the initial placement,
465 must occur as soon as possible after initial removal and
466 placement to evaluate the appropriateness of the initial
467 placement and to ensure that any adjustments to the placement,
468 if necessary, are promptly handled.
469 2. Changes in physical custody after the child is placed
470 in out-of-home care by a court and, if necessary, determination
471 of an appropriate mandatory transition plan in accordance with
472 s. 39.4023.
473 3. Changes in a child's educational placement and, if
474 necessary, determination of an appropriate mandatory transition
475 plan in accordance with s. 39.4023.
Page 19 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
476 4. Initial placement decisions or a change in placement
477 for a high-acuity child in a medical placement under s. 39.4078,
478 as appropriate, to stabilize such child.
479 5.4. Placement decisions for a child as required by
480 subparagraph 1., subparagraph 2., or subparagraph 3., or
481 subparagraph 4. which involve sibling groups that require
482 placement in accordance with s. 39.4024.
483 6.5. Any other important decisions in the child's life
484 which are so complex that the department or appropriate
485 community-based care lead agency determines convening a
486 multidisciplinary team staffing is necessary to ensure the best
487 interest of the child is maintained.
488 (6) ASSESSMENTS.—
489 (d)1. If the participants of a multidisciplinary team
490 staffing reach a unanimous consensus decision, it becomes the
491 official position of the community-based care lead agency
492 regarding the decision under subsection (5) for which the team
493 convened. Such decision is binding upon all department and lead
494 agency participants, who are obligated to support it.
495 2.a. If the participants of a multidisciplinary team
496 staffing cannot reach a unanimous consensus decision on a plan
497 to address the identified goal of a child who has not been
498 classified as high-acuity, the trained professional acting as
499 the facilitator shall notify the court and the department within
500 48 hours after the conclusion of the staffing. The department
Page 20 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
501 shall then determine how to address the identified goal of the
502 staffing by what is in the child's best interest.
503 b. If the participants of a multidisciplinary team
504 staffing cannot reach a unanimous consensus decision on a plan
505 to address the appropriate initial placement or change in
506 placement of a high-acuity child, the trained professional
507 acting as the facilitator must notify the court and the
508 department within 48 hours after the conclusion of the staffing.
509 The court must set an emergency evidentiary hearing within 10
510 days after such notification to address the appropriate initial
511 placement or change in placement of a high-acuity child and
512 determine if the high-acuity child should be placed in a medical
513 placement in accordance with s. 39.4078. The court may require
514 the representative from a community-based lead agency or the
515 department who was required to attend the multidisciplinary team
516 staffing to attend the evidentiary hearing.
517 Section 7. Subsection (1), paragraph (b) of subsection
518 (4), and paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of subsection (6) of
519 section 39.407, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
520 39.407 Medical, psychiatric, and psychological examination
521 and treatment of child; physical, mental, or substance abuse
522 examination of person with or requesting child custody.—
523 (1) When any child is removed from the home and maintained
524 in an out-of-home placement, the department is authorized to
525 have a medical screening performed on the child without
Page 21 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
526 authorization from the court and without consent from a parent
527 or legal custodian. Such medical screening shall be performed by
528 A licensed health care professional must perform such medical
529 screening and shall be to examine the child, in part, for
530 injury;, illness; mental, disability, or behavioral health
531 conditions;, and communicable diseases and to determine the need
532 for immunization. The department shall by rule establish the
533 invasiveness of the medical procedures authorized to be
534 performed under this subsection. In no case does This subsection
535 does not:
536 (a) Authorize the department to consent to medical
537 treatment for such children; or
538 (b) Limit the procedures for a medical placement of a
539 high-acuity child established under s. 39.4078.
540 (4)
541 (b) The judge may also order such child to be evaluated by
542 a psychiatrist or a psychologist or, if a developmental
543 disability is suspected or alleged, by the developmental
544 disability diagnostic and evaluation team of the department. If
545 it is necessary to place a child in a residential facility for
546 such evaluation, the criteria and procedure established in s.
547 394.463(2) or chapter 393 must shall be used, whichever is
548 applicable. If, after the evaluation is conducted under this
549 paragraph, the psychiatrist, psychologist, or developmental
550 disability diagnostic and evaluation team determines that the
Page 22 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
551 child meets the criteria to be classified as a high-acuity child
552 under s. 39.4078, the judge must immediately order the high-
553 acuity child to be placed in a medical placement to address the
554 basis for the child's high-acuity needs, even if there are other
555 placement options available under s. 39.4021.
556 (6) Children in the legal custody of the department may be
557 placed by the department, without prior approval of the court,
558 in a residential treatment center licensed under s. 394.875 or a
559 hospital licensed under chapter 395 for residential mental
560 health treatment only pursuant to this section or may be placed
561 by the court in accordance with an order of involuntary
562 examination or involuntary placement entered pursuant to s.
563 394.463 or s. 394.467. A high-acuity child may be placed in a
564 residential treatment program or medical placement, as
565 appropriate, which best meets the needs of the high-acuity child
566 based on the high-acuity child's complex medical, developmental,
567 behavioral health, or disability needs. All children placed in a
568 residential treatment program under this subsection must have a
569 guardian ad litem appointed.
570 (a) As used in this subsection, the term:
571 1. "Least restrictive alternative" means the treatment and
572 conditions of treatment that, separately and in combination, are
573 no more intrusive or restrictive of freedom than reasonably
574 necessary to achieve a substantial therapeutic benefit or to
575 protect the child or adolescent or others from physical injury.
Page 23 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
576 2. "Residential treatment" or "residential treatment
577 program" means a placement for observation, diagnosis, or
578 treatment of an emotional disturbance in a residential treatment
579 center licensed under s. 394.875 or a hospital licensed under
580 chapter 395. The term includes a medical placement under s.
581 39.4078 for a high-acuity child who presents with needs that are
582 not suitable for treatment in a standard foster care or
583 therapeutic group home environment due to the complexity of the
584 needs of the high-acuity child or the potential for harm to
585 others in the same care setting.
586 3. "Suitable for residential treatment" or "suitability"
587 means a determination concerning a child or adolescent who is
588 classified as a high-acuity child or a child or adolescent with
589 an emotional disturbance as defined in s. 394.492(5) or a
590 serious emotional disturbance as defined in s. 394.492(6) that
591 each of the following criteria is met:
592 a. The child requires residential treatment.
593 b. The child is in need of a residential treatment program
594 and is expected to benefit from mental or behavioral health
595 treatment, or a combination of treatment.
596 c. An appropriate, less restrictive alternative to
597 residential treatment is unavailable.
598 4. "Therapeutic group home" means a residential treatment
599 center that offers a 24-hour residential program providing
600 community-based mental health treatment and mental health
Page 24 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
601 support services to children who meet the criteria in s.
602 394.492(5) or (6) in a nonsecure, homelike setting.
603 (b) If Whenever the department believes that a child in
604 its legal custody is emotionally disturbed or is classified or
605 likely to be classified as a high-acuity child under s. 39.4078
606 and may need residential treatment, an examination and
607 suitability assessment must be conducted by a qualified
608 evaluator appointed by the department. This suitability
609 assessment must be completed before the placement of the child
610 in a residential treatment program.
611 1. The qualified evaluator for placement in a residential
612 treatment center, other than a therapeutic group home, or a
613 hospital must be a psychiatrist or a psychologist licensed in
614 this state who has at least 3 years of experience in the
615 diagnosis and treatment of serious emotional disturbances in
616 children and adolescents and who has no actual or perceived
617 conflict of interest with any inpatient facility or residential
618 treatment center or program.
619 2. The qualified evaluator for placement in a therapeutic
620 group home must be a psychiatrist licensed under chapter 458 or
621 chapter 459, a psychologist licensed under chapter 490, or a
622 mental health counselor licensed under chapter 491 who has at
623 least 2 years of experience in the diagnosis and treatment of
624 serious emotional, medical, developmental, or behavioral
625 disturbances disturbance in children, including high-acuity
Page 25 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
626 children, and adolescents and who has no actual or perceived
627 conflict of interest with any residential treatment center or
628 program.
629 (c)1. Consistent with the requirements of this section,
630 the child shall be assessed for suitability for residential
631 treatment by a qualified evaluator who has conducted an
632 examination and assessment of the child and has made written
633 findings that:
634 a.1. The child appears to have an emotional disturbance
635 serious enough to require treatment in a residential treatment
636 program and is reasonably likely to benefit from the treatment.
637 b.2. The child has been provided with a clinically
638 appropriate explanation of the nature and purpose of the
639 treatment.
640 c.3. All available modalities of treatment less
641 restrictive than residential treatment have been considered, and
642 a less restrictive alternative that would offer comparable
643 benefits to the child is unavailable.
644 2. A copy of the written findings of the evaluation and
645 suitability assessment must be provided to the department, to
646 the guardian ad litem, and, if the child is a member of a
647 Medicaid managed care plan, to the plan that is financially
648 responsible for the child's care in residential treatment, all
649 of whom must be provided with the opportunity to discuss the
650 findings with the evaluator.
Page 26 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
651 3. If the written findings of the evaluation and
652 suitability assessment state that the child meets the criteria
653 of a high-acuity child and there is not a suitable residential
654 treatment program or medical placement for the high-acuity child
655 identified within 5 business days after the written findings are
656 provided to the department and guardian ad litem, the high-
657 acuity child's guardian ad litem must notify the court within 24
658 hours after the expiration of the 5-day time period that there
659 is a failure to identify a suitable placement. Within 5 business
660 days after receiving such notification, the court must set an
661 emergency evidentiary hearing to determine the most suitable
662 placement for the high-acuity child in accordance with s.
663 39.4078. The court may prioritize the placement of a high-acuity
664 child who is being placed or currently residing in foster care
665 to a specialized and appropriate placement, including, but not
666 limited to, a medical bed or group home in a facility licensed
667 or maintained by the department, the Agency for Persons with
668 Disabilities, the Department of Health, or the Agency for Health
669 Care Administration.
670 Section 8. Section 39.4078, Florida Statutes, is created
671 to read:
672 39.4078 Medical Placement for High-acuity Children Act.—
673 (1) SHORT TITLE.—This section may be cited as the "Medical
674 Placement for High-acuity Children Act."
675 (2) LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT.—
Page 27 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
676 (a) The Legislature finds that high-acuity children,
677 particularly those with disabilities, who are entering or
678 currently involved in the child protection system in this state
679 require prompt and specialized medical health assessments, as
680 well as appropriate medical placements.
681 (b) It is the intent of the Legislature to establish a
682 time-limited, court-supervised process for the medical placement
683 of high-acuity children which:
684 1. Ensures the high-acuity child receives medically
685 necessary treatment and stabilization in the least restrictive
686 setting that can safely meet the child's needs.
687 2. Coordinates judicial oversight with clinical
688 assessment, case planning, and transition planning.
689 3. Promotes a prompt transfer to a less restrictive
690 setting as acute symptoms resolve, while preserving the high-
691 acuity child's rights to education, visitation, and normalcy.
692 (3) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
693 (a) "Community-based care lead agency" has the same
694 meaning as in s. 409.986(3).
695 (b) "Multidisciplinary team" has the same meaning as in s.
696 39.4022(2).
697 (4) APPLICABILITY.—This section applies to the assessment,
698 eligibility, placement, case plan tasks, transfers to more
699 restrictive and less restrictive settings, and discharge of
700 high-acuity children in medical placements. This section
Page 28 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
701 operates in accordance with ss. 39.4022, 39.407, 39.523, and
702 39.6013; however, if this section conflicts with another section
703 of law, this section prevails to the extent necessary to address
704 the needs of a high-acuity child.
705 (5) MEDICAL PLACEMENT.—A medical placement may include all
706 of the following, as clinically appropriate and subject to
707 applicable licensure under chapter 394, chapter 395, chapter
708 400, or chapter 409:
709 (a) Acute care beds for short-term intensive medical or
710 psychiatric treatment.
711 (b) Subacute beds for continued clinical support after
712 acute care.
713 (c) Therapeutic medical foster care providing in-home
714 medical services directed by a licensed health care
715 professional.
716 (d) Specialized residential treatment programs for
717 children with significant co-occurring medical and behavioral
718 health conditions.
719 (e) Placements that meet the requirements of the pilot
720 program of treatment foster care under s. 409.996(27).
721 (f) Other licensed settings capable of delivering
722 equivalent medically necessary services to a high-acuity child
723 in the least restrictive environment.
724 (6) REQUIREMENTS OF A MEDICAL PLACEMENT.—A medical
725 placement must do all of the following:
Page 29 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
726 (a) Stabilize the high-acuity child's acute symptoms and
727 address any immediate safety risks.
728 (b) Initiate or continue evidence-based treatment and
729 medication management consistent with s. 39.407.
730 (c) Maintain the high-acuity child's educational services
731 and reasonable family and sibling contact.
732 (d) Develop clear, time-limited clinical and functional
733 goals that determine when the high-acuity child is ready for a
734 less restrictive setting.
735 (e) Create a plan for placement and services that address
736 the range of needs of the high-acuity child from his or her
737 admission to a medical bed until he or she transitions to a less
738 restrictive setting and eventually reaches permanency.
739 (f) Ensure that high-acuity children in the custody of the
740 department under this chapter are given priority for placements
741 in the most appropriate facilities licensed or maintained by the
742 Agency for Persons with Disabilities, the Agency for Health Care
743 Administration, the Department of Health, or the department, as
744 applicable.
745 (7) ASSESSMENT AND ADMISSION.—
746 (a) Before admission to a medical placement, or within 24
747 hours after an emergency admission, a Child Protection Team must
748 collaborate with the department or community-based care lead
749 agency to obtain a comprehensive clinical assessment conducted
750 by a qualified licensed professional which identifies a high-
Page 30 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
751 acuity child's needs, recommended level of care, and anticipated
752 length of stay.
753 (b) In accordance with s. 39.4022, a multidisciplinary
754 team staffing must occur within 72 hours after a child is
755 classified as a high-acuity child and the staffing must include
756 all necessary participants who can appropriately address the
757 basis for classifying the child as a high-acuity child.
758 (c) The multidisciplinary team staffing must recommend the
759 least restrictive medical bed placement that is capable of
760 meeting the needs of the high-acuity child and identify
761 measurable goals and criteria for less restrictive placement.
762 The recommendations of the multidisciplinary team staffing must
763 be filed with a court pursuant to subsection (8).
764 (d) If the multidisciplinary team staffing cannot reach a
765 consensus on the placement of a high-acuity child, a designated
766 person present at the staffing must notify the court and, within
767 10 days after such notification, the court must hold an
768 emergency evidentiary hearing in accordance with s.
769 39.4022(6)(d)2.b.
770 (8) COURT APPROVAL AND WRITTEN FINDINGS.—
771 (a) Within 72 hours after a multidisciplinary team
772 staffing at which a consensus is made to place a high-acuity
773 child in a medical placement, the department shall petition the
774 court for approval of such placement. The petition must include
775 a copy of the comprehensive clinical assessment and
Page 31 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
776 recommendations of the multidisciplinary team staffing.
777 (b) The court shall conduct an evidentiary hearing and
778 provide written findings on all of the following:
779 1. The medical, behavioral, or complex conditions of the
780 child which is the basis for classifying the child as a high-
781 acuity child.
782 2. The medical bed suggested by the multidisciplinary team
783 staffing is the least restrictive setting available for the
784 high-acuity child.
785 3. Clearly defined goals and criteria for the high-acuity
786 child to enter a less restrictive placement.
787 4. The appropriate timeframe in which the case plan must
788 be updated to address the written findings of the court.
789 (c) Consent and authorization for medical, psychiatric,
790 and behavioral health services must be obtained and documented
791 in accordance with s. 39.407.
792 (d) The court must ensure that a high-acuity child's
793 educational services, including any individualized education
794 program services if applicable, continue without interruption
795 and that reasonable family and sibling contact occurs unless
796 such contact is against clinical judgment and court order.
797 (9) PERIODIC REVIEWS.—Within 30 days after the court
798 provides its written findings under subsection (8), and every 30
799 days thereafter for as long as the high-acuity child remains in
800 a medical placement, the court must review the high-acuity
Page 32 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
801 child's progress through acute presentation of complex
802 behaviors. Each review must include updated clinical reports,
803 the progress of the high-acuity child toward defined goals that
804 address the stabilization and treatment of any identified acuity
805 behaviors, educational progress, family and sibling contact, and
806 a recommendation regarding whether the high-acuity child is
807 ready for a less restrictive setting. Within 5 days before each
808 review hearing, the department must file with the court an
809 updated report that includes a recommendation for maintaining
810 the medical placement or, if appropriate, transferring the high-
811 acuity child to a less restrictive setting. The
812 multidisciplinary team staffing must reconvene before each
813 review unless such requirement is waived by the court.
814 (10) PLACEMENT PROCEDURES.—
815 (a) Upon motion of any party or on the court's own motion,
816 and based on competent substantial evidence of the high-acuity
817 child's clinical status, the court may immediately order the
818 high-acuity child to be moved to a less or more restrictive
819 licensed placement as indicated by the presence or resolution of
820 acute symptoms without having to wait for a regularly scheduled
821 review.
822 (b) The department may implement emergency procedures to a
823 more restrictive setting for the safety of the high-acuity child
824 or based on medical necessity. The department must notify the
825 court and all parties within 24 hours after implementation of
Page 33 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
826 emergency procedures. The court must set the matter for a
827 hearing within 3 days after being notified of the implementation
828 of emergency procedures.
829 (c) The transition between placements of a high-acuity
830 child must comply with s. 39.523 and include a written
831 transition plan that addresses medication continuity, treatment
832 hand-offs, education, and family and sibling contact of the
833 high-acuity child.
834 (11) CASE PLAN.—A high-acuity child's case plan must be
835 updated within 7 days after court approval under subsection (8)
836 and after each review under subsection (9) to reflect placement
837 goals and transition planning.
838 (12) DURATION OF A MEDICAL PLACEMENT.—
839 (a) A medical placement may not exceed 90 consecutive days
840 without express written consent by the court, supported by clear
841 and convincing evidence, that the medical placement remains
842 medically necessary and is the least restrictive setting
843 available to safely meet the needs of the high-acuity child.
844 (b) This section does not authorize the placement of a
845 high-acuity child in a setting prohibited by federal or state
846 law or rule.
847 (13) RIGHTS OF HIGH-ACUITY CHILDREN.—Unless otherwise
848 ordered by the court, a high-acuity child who is in a medical
849 placement retains all rights under this chapter, including, but
850 not limited to, access to an attorney ad litem and a guardian ad
Page 34 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
851 litem, reasonable visitation with family and siblings,
852 individualized education program services, and participation in
853 case plan development based on the age and capacity of the high-
854 acuity child.
855 (14) ANNUAL REPORT.—
856 (a) The department shall collect data relating to the
857 Medical Placement for High-acuity Children Act including
858 admissions, placement types, lengths of stay, goals achieved,
859 outcomes of less-restrictive settings, recidivism, education
860 continuity, family and sibling contact, and time to permanency.
861 Community-based lead agencies and providers must furnish to the
862 department any data required to comply with this subsection.
863 (b) By January 31, 2027, and annually thereafter, the
864 department shall submit to the President of the Senate and the
865 Speaker of the House of Representatives a report relating to
866 utilization, outcomes, and service gaps of and recommendations
867 to the Medical Placement for High-acuity Children Act.
868 (15) CONSTRUCTION.—This section may not be construed to
869 limit the requirements of medical consent under s. 39.407 or the
870 court's authority under s. 39.522.
871 (16) RULEMAKING.—The department and the Department of
872 Health may adopt rules to implement this section.
873 Section 9. Paragraphs (c) and (d) of subsection (1) and
874 subsection (2) of section 39.523, Florida Statutes, are amended,
875 and paragraph (e) is added to subsection (1) of that section, to
Page 35 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
876 read:
877 39.523 Placement in out-of-home care.—
878 (1) LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT.—
879 (c) The Legislature also finds that the timely
880 identification of and therapeutic response to acute presentation
881 of symptoms indicative of trauma or high-acuity complex needs
882 can reduce adverse outcomes for a child, aid in the
883 identification of services to enhance initial placement
884 stability and of supports to caregivers, and reduce placement
885 disruption.
886 (d) It is the intent of the Legislature that whenever a
887 child is unable to safely remain at home with a parent, the most
888 appropriate available out-of-home placement must shall be chosen
889 after an assessment of the child's needs and the availability of
890 caregivers qualified to meet the child's needs, including
891 certain group or treatment settings that are appropriate for
892 addressing the needs of a high-acuity child.
893 (e) It is the intent of the Legislature that this section
894 applies to transitions between all out-of-home placements,
895 including, but not limited to, medical placements under s.
896 39.4078.
897 (2) ASSESSMENT AND PLACEMENT.—When any child is removed
898 from a home and placed in out-of-home care, a comprehensive
899 placement assessment process shall be completed in accordance
900 with s. 39.4022 or s. 39.4078, as applicable, to determine the
Page 36 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
901 level of care needed by the child and match the child with the
902 most appropriate placement.
903 (a) In accordance with rules adopted by the department,
904 the department, or community-based care lead agency, or Child
905 Protection Team, if the child being evaluated has been
906 identified as a high-acuity child under s. 39.4078, must:
907 1. Coordinate a multidisciplinary team staffing as
908 established in s. 39.4022 with the necessary participants for
909 the stated purpose of the staffing.
910 2. Conduct a trauma screening as soon as practicable after
911 the child's removal from his or her home but no later than 21
912 days after the shelter hearing. If indicated as appropriate or
913 necessary by the screening, the department or community-based
914 care lead agency must, at a minimum:
915 a. Promptly refer the child to appropriate trauma
916 assessment, which must be completed within 30 days, and if
917 appropriate, services and intervention as needed. To the extent
918 possible, the trauma screening, the assessment, and the services
919 and intervention must be integrated into the child's overall
920 behavioral health treatment planning and services.
921 b. In accordance with s. 409.1415(2)(b)3.f., provide
922 information and support, which may include, but need not be
923 limited to, consultation, coaching, training, and referrals to
924 services, to the caregiver of the child to help the caregiver
925 respond to and care for the child in a trauma-informed and
Page 37 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
926 therapeutic manner.
927 (b) The comprehensive placement assessment process may
928 also include the use of an assessment instrument or tool that is
929 best suited for the individual child and is able to identify a
930 high-acuity child.
931 (c) The most appropriate available out-of-home placement
932 shall be chosen after consideration by all members of the
933 multidisciplinary team of all of the information and data
934 gathered, including the results and recommendations of any
935 evaluations conducted and considering the most appropriate
936 placement of each child under ss. 39.4021 and 39.4022.
937 (d) Placement decisions for each child in out-of-home
938 placement shall be reviewed as often as necessary to ensure
939 permanency for that child and address special issues related to
940 this population of children.
941 (e) The department, a community-based care lead agency, or
942 a case management organization must document all placement
943 assessments and placement decisions in the Florida Safe Families
944 Network.
945 (f) If it is determined during the comprehensive placement
946 assessment process that:
947 1. Residential treatment as defined in s. 39.407 would be
948 suitable for the child, the procedures in that section must be
949 followed.
950 2. A child is classified as a high-acuity child, the
Page 38 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
951 procedures in s. 39.4078 must be followed.
952 (g) The appropriate agencies and departments must
953 prioritize the placement of a high-acuity child who is taken
954 into or currently in out-of-home care under this chapter into a
955 specialized and appropriate placement, including, but not
956 limited to, a medical bed or group home placement in a facility
957 licensed or maintained by the department, the Department of
958 Health, the Agency for Persons with Disabilities, or the Agency
959 for Health Care Administration.
960 Section 10. Subsection (2) and paragraph (a) of subsection
961 (3) of section 39.6012, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
962 39.6012 Case plan tasks; services.—
963 (2) The case plan must include all available information
964 that is relevant to the child's care including, at a minimum:
965 (a) A description of the identified needs of the child
966 while in care, including the needs of a child who has been
967 evaluated and meets the criteria of a high-acuity child. The
968 description of such needs must be specific enough for the parent
969 or caregiver to sufficiently understand how to properly address
970 any high-acuity medical conditions and the provision of care for
971 such conditions to ensure the safe placement and care of the
972 high-acuity child in compliance with s. 39.4078.
973 (b) A description of the plan for ensuring that the child
974 receives safe and proper care and that services are provided to
975 the child in order to address the child's needs. To the extent
Page 39 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
976 available and accessible, all of the following health, mental
977 health, and education information and records of the child must
978 be attached to the case plan and updated throughout the judicial
979 review process:
980 1. The names and addresses of the child's health, mental
981 health, and educational providers.;
982 2. The child's grade level performance.;
983 3. The child's school record or, if the child is under the
984 age of school entry, any records from a child care program,
985 early education program, or preschool program.;
986 4. Documentation of compliance or noncompliance with the
987 attendance requirements under s. 39.604, if the child is
988 enrolled in a child care program, early education program, or
989 preschool program.;
990 5. Assurances that the child's placement takes into
991 account proximity to the school in which the child is enrolled
992 at the time of placement.;
993 6. The child's immunizations.;
994 7. The child's known medical history, including any known
995 health problems.;
996 8. The child's medications, if any.; and
997 9. Any other relevant health, mental health, and education
998 information concerning the child.
999 10. Any other tasks that the Child Protection Team deems
1000 appropriate for a case plan that is prepared in accordance with
Page 40 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
1001 s. 39.4078 for a high-acuity child which are specific to
1002 addressing the child's high-acuity needs and appropriate
1003 transition plans to more restrictive and less restrictive
1004 settings, regardless of whether the high-acuity designation is
1005 based on the child's mental health, behavioral health,
1006 disability, or involvement with the juvenile justice system.
1007 (3) In addition to any other requirement, if the child is
1008 in an out-of-home placement, the case plan must include:
1009 (a) A description of the type of placement in which the
1010 child is to be living, including if such placement is a medical
1011 bed in a medical placement for a high-acuity child.
1012 Section 11. Subsections (1) and (2) of section 39.6013,
1013 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1014 39.6013 Case plan amendments.—
1015 (1) After the case plan has been developed under s.
1016 39.6011, the tasks and services agreed upon in the plan may not
1017 be changed or altered in any way except as provided in this
1018 section. If a high-acuity child is placed in a medical
1019 placement, the case plan must reflect the goals, services, and
1020 transition requirements identified in s. 39.4078.
1021 (2) The case plan may be amended at any time in order to
1022 change the goal of the plan, employ the use of concurrent
1023 planning, add or remove tasks the parent must complete to
1024 substantially comply with the plan, provide appropriate services
1025 for the child, and update the child's health, mental health, and
Page 41 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
1026 education records as required by s. 39.4078 or s. 39.6012.
1027 Section 12. Paragraph (k) is added to subsection (1) of
1028 section 391.025, Florida Statutes, to read:
1029 391.025 Applicability and scope.—
1030 (1) The Children's Medical Services program consists of
1031 the following components:
1032 (k) The Medical Placement for High-acuity Children Act
1033 established under s. 39.4078.
1034 Section 13. Subsection (1) of section 391.029, Florida
1035 Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (d) is added to subsection
1036 (2) and paragraph (d) is added to subsection (3) of that
1037 section, to read:
1038 391.029 Program eligibility.—
1039 (1) Eligibility for the Children's Medical Services
1040 program is based on the diagnosis of one or more chronic and
1041 serious medical conditions or meeting the criteria for a high-
1042 acuity child as defined in s. 39.01 and the family's need for
1043 specialized services.
1044 (2) The following individuals are eligible to receive
1045 services through the program:
1046 (d) Children or youth with complex behavioral or mental
1047 health needs from birth to 18 years of age who meet the criteria
1048 of a high-acuity child as defined in s. 39.01 or who are placed
1049 in a medical bed in a medical placement under s. 39.4078.
1050 (3) Subject to the availability of funds, the following
Page 42 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
1051 individuals may receive services through the Children's Medical
1052 Services Safety Net program:
1053 (d) Children or youth with complex behavioral or mental
1054 health needs from birth to 18 years of age who meet the criteria
1055 of a high-acuity child as defined in s. 39.01 or who are placed
1056 in a medical bed in a medical placement under s. 39.4078.
1057 Section 14.. Subsection (5) of section 393.065, Florida
1058 Statutes, is amended to read:
1059 393.065 Application and eligibility determination.—
1060 (5) Except as provided in subsections (6) and (7), if a
1061 client seeking enrollment in the developmental disabilities home
1062 and community-based services Medicaid waiver program meets the
1063 level of care requirement for an intermediate care facility for
1064 individuals with intellectual disabilities pursuant to 42 C.F.R.
1065 ss. 435.217(b)(1) and 440.150, the agency must assign the client
1066 to an appropriate preenrollment category pursuant to this
1067 subsection and must provide priority to clients waiting for
1068 waiver services in the following order:
1069 (a) Category 1, which includes clients deemed to be in
1070 crisis as described in rule and clients who meet the criteria of
1071 a high-acuity child as defined in s. 39.01, must be given first
1072 priority in moving from the preenrollment categories to the
1073 waiver.
1074 (b) Category 2, which includes clients in the
1075 preenrollment categories who are:
Page 43 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
1076 1. From the child welfare system with an open case in the
1077 Department of Children and Families' statewide automated child
1078 welfare information system and who are either:
1079 a. Transitioning out of the child welfare system into
1080 permanency; or
1081 b. At least 18 years but not yet 22 years of age and who
1082 need both waiver services and extended foster care services; or
1083 2. At least 18 years but not yet 22 years of age and who
1084 withdrew consent pursuant to s. 39.6251(5)(c) to remain in the
1085 extended foster care system.
1086
1087 For individuals who are at least 18 years but not yet 22 years
1088 of age and who are eligible under sub-subparagraph 1.b., the
1089 agency must provide waiver services, including residential
1090 habilitation, and must actively participate in transition
1091 planning activities, including, but not limited to,
1092 individualized service coordination, case management support,
1093 and ensuring continuity of care pursuant to s. 39.6035. The
1094 community-based care lead agency must fund room and board at the
1095 rate established in s. 409.145(3) and provide case management
1096 and related services as defined in s. 409.986(3)(f)
1097 409.986(3)(e). Individuals may receive both waiver services and
1098 services under s. 39.6251. Services may not duplicate services
1099 available through the Medicaid state plan.
1100 (c) Category 3, which includes, but is not required to be
Page 44 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
1101 limited to, clients:
1102 1. Whose caregiver has a documented condition that is
1103 expected to render the caregiver unable to provide care within
1104 the next 12 months and for whom a caregiver is required but no
1105 alternate caregiver is available;
1106 2. At substantial risk of incarceration or court
1107 commitment without supports;
1108 3. Whose documented behaviors or physical needs place them
1109 or their caregiver at risk of serious harm and other supports
1110 are not currently available to alleviate the situation; or
1111 4. Who are identified as ready for discharge within the
1112 next year from a state mental health hospital or skilled nursing
1113 facility and who require a caregiver but for whom no caregiver
1114 is available or whose caregiver is unable to provide the care
1115 needed.
1116 (d) Category 4, which includes, but is not required to be
1117 limited to, clients whose caregivers are 60 years of age or
1118 older and for whom a caregiver is required but no alternate
1119 caregiver is available.
1120 (e) Category 5, which includes, but is not required to be
1121 limited to, clients who are expected to graduate within the next
1122 12 months from secondary school and need support to obtain a
1123 meaningful day activity, maintain competitive employment, or
1124 pursue an accredited program of postsecondary education to which
1125 they have been accepted.
Page 45 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
1126 (f) Category 6, which includes clients 21 years of age or
1127 older who do not meet the criteria for category 1, category 2,
1128 category 3, category 4, or category 5.
1129 (g) Category 7, which includes clients younger than 21
1130 years of age who do not meet the criteria for category 1,
1131 category 2, category 3, or category 4.
1132
1133 Within preenrollment categories 3, 4, 5, 6, and 7, the agency
1134 shall prioritize clients in the order of the date that the
1135 client is determined eligible for waiver services. A client
1136 within any preenrollment category who meets the criteria of a
1137 high-acuity child as defined in s. 39.01 whose high-acuity
1138 designation is related to a disability that otherwise makes the
1139 child eligible for services under this chapter, must be placed
1140 in category 1 for priority placement in an appropriate medical
1141 bed in a medical placement in accordance with s. 39.4078 if the
1142 child is taken into or is currently in the custody of the
1143 Department of Children and Families under chapter 39.
1144 Section 15. Paragraph (p) of subsection (4), paragraph (a)
1145 of subsection (6), and paragraph (a) of subsection (7) of
1146 section 394.495, Florida Statutes, are amended, and paragraph
1147 (r) is added to subsection (4) of that section, to read:
1148 394.495 Child and adolescent mental health system of care;
1149 programs and services.—
1150 (4) The array of services may include, but is not limited
Page 46 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
1151 to:
1152 (p) Trauma-informed services for children who have
1153 suffered sexual exploitation as defined in s. 39.01(83)(g) s.
1154 39.01(80)(g).
1155 (r) Placement in a medical bed in a medical placement
1156 under s. 39.4078.
1157 (6) The department shall contract for community action
1158 treatment teams throughout the state with the managing entities.
1159 A community action treatment team shall:
1160 (a) Provide community-based behavioral health and support
1161 services to children from 11 to 13 years of age, adolescents,
1162 and young adults from 18 to 21 years of age with serious
1163 behavioral health conditions who are at risk of out-of-home
1164 placement as demonstrated by:
1165 1. Repeated failures at less intensive levels of care;
1166 2. Two or more behavioral health hospitalizations;
1167 3. Involvement with the Department of Juvenile Justice;
1168 4. A history of multiple episodes involving law
1169 enforcement; or
1170 5. A record of poor academic performance or suspensions;
1171 or
1172 6. A designation as a high-acuity child as defined in s.
1173 39.01 or placement in a medical bed in a medical placement under
1174 s. 39.4078.
1175
Page 47 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
1176 Children younger than 11 years of age who otherwise meet the
1177 criteria in this paragraph may be candidates for such services
1178 if they demonstrate two or more of the characteristics listed in
1179 subparagraphs 1.-5.
1180 (7)(a) The department shall contract with managing
1181 entities for mobile response teams throughout the state to
1182 provide immediate, onsite behavioral health crisis services to
1183 children, adolescents, and young adults ages 18 to 25,
1184 inclusive, who:
1185 1. Have an emotional disturbance;
1186 2. Are experiencing an acute mental or emotional crisis;
1187 3. Are experiencing escalating emotional or behavioral
1188 reactions and symptoms that impact their ability to function
1189 typically within the family, living situation, or community
1190 environment; or
1191 4. Are served by the child welfare system and are
1192 experiencing or are at high risk of placement instability; or
1193 5. Have been evaluated and meet the criteria of a high-
1194 acuity child as defined in s. 39.01 or who are placed in a
1195 medical bed in a medical placement under s. 39.4078.
1196 Section 16. Paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (2) of
1197 section 409.145, Florida Statutes, are amended, and paragraph
1198 (h) is added to subsection (1) of that section, to read:
1199 409.145 Care of children; "reasonable and prudent parent"
1200 standard.—The child welfare system of the department shall
Page 48 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
1201 operate as a coordinated community-based system of care which
1202 empowers all caregivers for children in foster care to provide
1203 quality parenting, including approving or disapproving a child's
1204 participation in activities based on the caregiver's assessment
1205 using the "reasonable and prudent parent" standard.
1206 (1) SYSTEM OF CARE.—The department shall develop,
1207 implement, and administer a coordinated community-based system
1208 of care for children who are found to be dependent and their
1209 families. This system of care must be directed toward the
1210 following goals:
1211 (h) Ensure that a child who has been designated as a high-
1212 acuity child after an assessment for such purpose has the most
1213 appropriate medical placement and necessary services, including
1214 transitions to more restrictive and less restrictive settings,
1215 to address the acute or chronic expression of the medical
1216 conditions that are the reason for the high-acuity designation.
1217 (2) REASONABLE AND PRUDENT PARENT STANDARD.—
1218 (a) Definitions.—As used in this subsection, the term:
1219 1. "Age-appropriate" means an activity or item that is
1220 generally accepted as suitable for a child of the same
1221 chronological age or level of maturity. Age appropriateness is
1222 based on the development of cognitive, emotional, physical, and
1223 behavioral capacity which is typical for an age or age group.
1224 2. "Caregiver" means a person with whom the child is
1225 placed in out-of-home care, or a designated official for a group
Page 49 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
1226 care facility licensed by the department under s. 409.175.
1227 3. "High-acuity child" has the same meaning as in s.
1228 39.01.
1229 4.3. "Reasonable and prudent parent" standard means the
1230 standard of care used by a caregiver in determining whether to
1231 allow a child in his or her care to participate in
1232 extracurricular, enrichment, and social activities. This
1233 standard is characterized by careful and thoughtful parental
1234 decisionmaking that is intended to maintain a child's health,
1235 safety, and best interest while encouraging the child's
1236 emotional and developmental growth.
1237 (b) Application of standard of care.—
1238 1. Every child who comes into out-of-home care pursuant to
1239 this chapter is entitled to participate in age-appropriate
1240 extracurricular, enrichment, and social activities.
1241 2. Each caregiver shall use the reasonable and prudent
1242 parent standard in determining whether to give permission for a
1243 child living in out-of-home care to participate in
1244 extracurricular, enrichment, or social activities. When using
1245 the reasonable and prudent parent standard, the caregiver must
1246 consider:
1247 a. The child's age, maturity, and developmental level to
1248 maintain the overall health and safety of the child.
1249 b. The potential risk factors and the appropriateness of
1250 the extracurricular, enrichment, or social activity.
Page 50 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
1251 c. The best interest of the child, based on information
1252 known by the caregiver.
1253 d. The importance of encouraging the child's emotional and
1254 developmental growth.
1255 e. The importance of providing the child with the most
1256 family-like living experience possible.
1257 f. The behavioral history of the child and the child's
1258 ability to safely participate in the proposed activity.
1259
1260 For a high-acuity child, the medical necessity of such child and
1261 the need for medical placement or transitions to more
1262 restrictive and less restrictive settings take priority over the
1263 reasonable and prudent parent standard until such time as the
1264 court determines that the acute or chronic expression of the
1265 medical conditions that are the reason for the high-acuity
1266 designation have been stabilized.
1267 Section 17. Paragraph (d) of subsection (2) of section
1268 409.166, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1269 409.166 Children within the child welfare system; adoption
1270 assistance program.—
1271 (2) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
1272 (d) "Difficult-to-place child" means:
1273 1. A child whose permanent custody has been awarded to the
1274 department or to a licensed child-placing agency;
1275 2. A child who has established significant emotional ties
Page 51 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
1276 with his or her foster parents or is not likely to be adopted
1277 because he or she is:
1278 a. Eight years of age or older;
1279 b. Developmentally disabled;
1280 c. Physically or emotionally handicapped;
1281 d. A member of a racial group that is disproportionately
1282 represented among children described in subparagraph 1.; or
1283 e. A member of a sibling group of any age, provided two or
1284 more members of a sibling group remain together for purposes of
1285 adoption; or
1286 f. A high-acuity child as defined in s. 39.01; and
1287 3. Except when the child is being adopted by the child's
1288 foster parents or relative caregivers, a child for whom a
1289 reasonable but unsuccessful effort has been made to place the
1290 child without providing a maintenance subsidy.
1291 Section 18. Subsection (30) is added to section 409.906,
1292 Florida Statutes, to read:
1293 409.906 Optional Medicaid services.—Subject to specific
1294 appropriations, the agency may make payments for services which
1295 are optional to the state under Title XIX of the Social Security
1296 Act and are furnished by Medicaid providers to recipients who
1297 are determined to be eligible on the dates on which the services
1298 were provided. Any optional service that is provided shall be
1299 provided only when medically necessary and in accordance with
1300 state and federal law. Optional services rendered by providers
Page 52 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
1301 in mobile units to Medicaid recipients may be restricted or
1302 prohibited by the agency. Nothing in this section shall be
1303 construed to prevent or limit the agency from adjusting fees,
1304 reimbursement rates, lengths of stay, number of visits, or
1305 number of services, or making any other adjustments necessary to
1306 comply with the availability of moneys and any limitations or
1307 directions provided for in the General Appropriations Act or
1308 chapter 216. If necessary to safeguard the state's systems of
1309 providing services to elderly and disabled persons and subject
1310 to the notice and review provisions of s. 216.177, the Governor
1311 may direct the Agency for Health Care Administration to amend
1312 the Medicaid state plan to delete the optional Medicaid service
1313 known as "Intermediate Care Facilities for the Developmentally
1314 Disabled." Optional services may include:
1315 (30) The agency may pay for a medical bed in a medical
1316 placement and any transitions to more restrictive and less
1317 restrictive settings that are required to appropriately serve a
1318 high-acuity child as defined in s. 39.01 to ensure that a child
1319 designated as a high-acuity child has the most appropriate
1320 placement and services necessary to address the acute or chronic
1321 expression of the medical conditions that are the reason for the
1322 high-acuity designation. The agency may seek federal approval if
1323 necessary to implement this subsection.
1324 Section 19. Paragraph (e) of subsection (3) of section
1325 409.986, Florida Statutes, is redesignated as paragraph (f),
Page 53 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
1326 paragraph (j) is added to subsection (2) and a new paragraph (e)
1327 is added to subsection (3) of that section, to read:
1328 409.986 Legislative findings and intent; child protection
1329 and child welfare outcomes; definitions.—
1330 (2) CHILD PROTECTION AND CHILD WELFARE OUTCOMES.—It is the
1331 goal of the department to protect the best interest of children
1332 by achieving the following outcomes in conjunction with the
1333 community-based care lead agency, community-based
1334 subcontractors, and the community alliance:
1335 (j) If applicable, the needs of a high-acuity child are
1336 stabilized and the child is provided the most appropriate
1337 services and placements.
1338 (3) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this part, except as otherwise
1339 provided, the term:
1340 (e) "High-acuity child" has the same meaning as in s.
1341 39.01.
1342 Section 20. Paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of section
1343 934.255, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1344 934.255 Subpoenas in investigations of sexual offenses.—
1345 (1) As used in this section, the term:
1346 (c) "Sexual abuse of a child" means a criminal offense
1347 based on any conduct described in s. 39.01(83) s. 39.01(80).
1348 Section 21. Subsection (5) of section 960.065, Florida
1349 Statutes, is amended to read:
1350 960.065 Eligibility for awards.—
Page 54 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 475 2026
1351 (5) A person is not ineligible for an award pursuant to
1352 paragraph (2)(a), paragraph (2)(b), or paragraph (2)(c) if that
1353 person is a victim of sexual exploitation of a child as defined
1354 in s. 39.01(83)(g) s. 39.01(80)(g).
1355 Section 22. Subsection (24) of section 984.03, Florida
1356 Statutes, is amended to read:
1357 984.03 Definitions.—When used in this chapter, the term:
1358 (24) "Neglect" has the same meaning as in s. 39.01 s.
1359 39.01(53).
1360 Section 23. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 55 of 55
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb475-00